Vermont, session 2025-2026, H555.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 24 V.S.A. § 2291 is amended to read:
§ 2291. ENUMERATION OF POWERS
For the purpose of promoting the public health, safety, welfare, and
convenience, a town, city, or incorporated village shall have the following
powers:
* * *
(26) To regulate parking lots and parking meters on public property or
public highways of the municipality, including the power to set parking fees
VT LEG #386002 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.555
2026 Page 2 of 2
and use parking revenues for any municipal purpose. Projects relating to
parking lots and parking meters under this subdivision shall constitute an
improvement under chapter 53 of this title, and a municipality shall have the
right of eminent domain to condemn land necessary for such projects subject to
the restrictions set forth in section 2805 of this title and 18 V.S.A. § 5318. A
vehicle with disabled veteran plates issued by any state shall be permitted to
park at a parking meter without fee.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386002 v.1